District of Columbia statutes.
9-306

John Philip Sousa Bridge.

The bridge authorized to be erected over the Anacostia River, in the District of Columbia, in the line of Pennsylvania Avenue shall be, on and after March 7, 1939, known as the John Philip Sousa Bridge.

History

Mar. 7, 1939, 53 Stat. 512, ch. 8

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-506.
1973 Ed., § 7-506.